tests/necessitative.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../sah.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../sah.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "буол":
    буол<v><iv><nec><p1><sg> : буолуохтаахпын
    буол<v><iv><nec><p2><sg> : буолуохтааххын
    буол<v><iv><nec><p3><sg> : буолуохтаах
    буол<v><iv><nec><p1><pl> : буолуохтаахпыт
    буол<v><iv><nec><p2><pl> : буолуохтааххыт
    буол<v><iv><nec><p3><pl> : буолуохтаахтар

  "кэл":
    кэл<v><iv><nec><p3><sg> : кэлиэхтээх
    кэл<v><iv><nec><p3><pl> : кэлиэхтээхтэр

  "үлэлээ":
    үлэлээ<v><iv><nec><p2><sg> : үлэлиэхтээххин
    үлэлээ<v><iv><nec><p3><sg> : үлэлиэхтээх
    үлэлээ<v><iv><nec><p1><sg> : үлэлиэхтээхпит
    үлэлээ<v><iv><nec><p3><pl> : үлэлиэхтээхтэр

  "көр":
    көр<v><iv><nec><p2><sg> : көрүөхтээххин
    көр<v><iv><nec><p3><sg> : көрүөхтээх
    көр<v><iv><nec><p1><pl> : көрүөхтээхпит
    көр<v><iv><nec><p3><pl> : көрүөхтээхтэр
